Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB169.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2407.2. Program for Sale of Used Pursuit Vehicles.--(a) The department shall create a program designed to allow a local or regional police department within this Commonwealth to purchase select used pursuit vehicles at a fixed price no later than 20 days prior to the next scheduled sale date.(b) The Pennsylvania State Police shall allocate up to ten per centum (10%) of its available used pursuit vehicle inventory for the program.(c) Payment for a used pursuit vehicle under the program shall be required prior to obtaining the vehicle and shall be made by organization check only.(d) The program shall allow a local or regional police department within this Commonwealth to submit a form, developed by the department, which shall contain a section for a description and quantity of desired surplus pursuit vehicles. Upon submission of the form, the department shall make every effort to notify the local or regional police department when vehicles matching the description within the submitted form become available for purchase through the program at a fixed price.(e) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this section.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Department" means the Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Fixed price" means a price set by the department that is not subject to bargaining.20250HB0169PN0127 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Local or regional police department" means a police department that is established by a political subdivision within this Commonwealth or that has been consolidated by act of a municipal governing body."Program" means the program for the sale of used pursuit vehicles under this section."Pursuit vehicle" means a publicly owned vehicle that is operated by a law enforcement agency and used for the patrol functions of the law enforcement agency.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0169PN0127 - 3 - 12345678910